Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1603
Private, denominational, or parochial schools; religious instruction; sections, how construed.

Nothing contained in sections 79-1601 to 79-1607 shall be so construed as to interfere with religious instruction in any private, denominational, or parochial school.

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 3, p. 349;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(j), p. 230;

C.S.1922, § 6508h;

C.S.1929, § 79-1908;

R.S.1943, § 79-1915;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 508, p. 864;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1703;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1006.